Tennessee, session 114, HB0536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 17, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding this chapter or another law to the contrary, a motor vehicle
dealer applicant without an established place of business is eligible for a motor vehicle
dealer license if the applicant is a nonprofit religious organization that:
(1) Is organized or incorporated in this state;
(2) Has its certificate of incorporation or certificate of authority in good
standing with the secretary of state; and
(3) Has an established program in this state of receiving donations of
motor vehicles that it donates to individuals with demonstrated need of a motor
vehicle, and providing free vehicle repair services to individuals with
demonstrated need of such services, which donations and services are
necessary to the individual's effort to become a self-sufficient member of the
workforce.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0536
002018
- 1 -